Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-2104
Assessments; collection and remittance.

(1) Except as provided in section 68-2106, the department shall collect assessments from hospitals and remit the assessments to the State Treasurer for credit to the Hospital Quality Assurance and Access Assessment Fund. It is the intent of the Legislature that no proceeds from the fund, including the federal match, shall be credited directly to the General Fund except as provided in subdivision (3)(a) of section 68-2106.

(2) The first quarterly payment of each fiscal year made by the department shall be transferred from the General Fund. All remaining quarterly payments shall be paid as provided in section 68-2106.

Laws 2024, LB1087, § 4.